Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 3-104, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3-104. There is hereby created the office of Director


of Wildlife Conservation, under Section 3, Article XXVI of the


Oklahoma Constitution of the State of Oklahoma, to be appointed by a


majority vote of the entire Commission, who shall be removed only


for cause and after public hearing by the Commission serve at the


pleasure of the Commission. His or her duties and compensation for


his or her services shall be fixed by a majority vote of the entire


Commission.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2708 YG 1/15/2026 1:17:02 PM

Req. No. 2708 Page 1